Connecticut, session 2026, HB05176.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the sum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars be appropriated
to the Department of Social Services, from the General Fund, for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for a grant-in-aid to Spanish
Community of Wallingford.